build/patterns_for_hyphen.txt
ü1xá
ü1xé
ü1xí
ü1xó
ü1xú
ü1yá
ü1yé
ü1yí
ü1yó
ü1yú
ü1zá
ü1zé
ü1zí
ü1zó
ü1zú
ü1rrá
ü1rré
ü1rrí
ü1rró
ü1rrú
ü1llá
ü1llé
ü1llí
ü1lló
ü1llú
ü1chá
ü1ché
ü1chí
ü1chó
ü1chú
a1by.
ab1y
a1cy.
ac1y
a1dy.
ad1y
a1fy.
af1y
a1gy.
ag1y
a1hy.
a1jy.
aj1y
a1ky.
ak1y
a1ly.
al1y
a1my.
am1y
a1ny.
an1y
a1ñy.
añ1y
a1py.
ap1y
a1qy.
a1ry.
ar1y
a1sy.
as1y
a1ty.
at1y
a1vy.
a1wy.
a1xy.
ax1y
a1zy.
az1y
a1rry.
arr1y
a1lly.
all1y
a1chy.
e1by.
eb1y
e1cy.
ec1y
e1dy.
ed1y
e1fy.
ef1y
e1gy.
eg1y
e1hy.
e1jy.
ej1y
e1ky.
ek1y
e1ly.
el1y
e1my.
em1y
e1ny.
en1y
e1ñy.
eñ1y
e1py.
ep1y
e1qy.
e1ry.
er1y
e1sy.
es1y
e1ty.
et1y
e1vy.
e1wy.
e1xy.
ex1y
e1zy.
ez1y
e1rry.
err1y
e1lly.
ell1y
e1chy.
i1by.
ib1y
i1cy.
ic1y
i1dy.
id1y
i1fy.
if1y
i1gy.
ig1y
i1hy.
i1jy.
ij1y
i1ky.
ik1y
i1ly.
il1y
i1my.
im1y
i1ny.
in1y
i1ñy.
iñ1y
i1py.
ip1y
i1qy.
i1ry.
ir1y
i1sy.
is1y
i1ty.
it1y
i1vy.
i1wy.
i1xy.
ix1y
i1zy.
iz1y
i1rry.
irr1y
i1lly.
ill1y
i1chy.
o1by.
ob1y
o1cy.
oc1y
o1dy.
od1y
o1fy.
of1y
o1gy.
og1y
o1hy.
o1jy.
oj1y
o1ky.
ok1y
o1ly.
ol1y
o1my.
om1y
o1ny.
on1y
o1ñy.
oñ1y
o1py.
op1y
o1qy.
o1ry.
or1y
o1sy.
os1y
o1ty.
ot1y
o1vy.
o1wy.
o1xy.
ox1y
o1zy.
oz1y
o1rry.
orr1y
o1lly.
oll1y
o1chy.
u1by.
ub1y
u1cy.
uc1y
u1dy.
ud1y
u1fy.
uf1y
u1gy.
ug1y
u1hy.
u1jy.
uj1y
u1ky.
uk1y
u1ly.
ul1y
u1my.
um1y
u1ny.
un1y
u1ñy.
uñ1y
u1py.
up1y
u1qy.
u1ry.
ur1y
u1sy.
us1y
u1ty.
ut1y
u1vy.
u1wy.
u1xy.
ux1y
u1zy.
uz1y
u1rry.
urr1y
u1lly.
ull1y
u1chy.
ü1by.
üb1y
ü1cy.
üc1y
ü1dy.
üd1y
ü1fy.
üf1y
ü1gy.
üg1y
ü1hy.
ü1jy.
üj1y
ü1ky.
ük1y
ü1ly.
ül1y
ü1my.
üm1y
ü1ny.
ün1y
ü1ñy.
üñ1y
ü1py.
üp1y
ü1qy.
ü1ry.
ür1y
ü1sy.
üs1y
ü1ty.
üt1y
ü1vy.
ü1wy.
ü1xy.
üx1y
ü1zy.
üz1y
ü1rry.
ürr1y
ü1lly.
üll1y
ü1chy.
á1by.
áb1y
á1cy.
ác1y
á1dy.
ád1y
á1fy.
áf1y
á1gy.
ág1y
á1hy.
á1jy.
áj1y
á1ky.
ák1y
á1ly.
ál1y
á1my.
ám1y
á1ny.
án1y
á1ñy.
áñ1y
á1py.
áp1y
á1qy.
á1ry.
ár1y
á1sy.
ás1y
á1ty.
át1y
á1vy.
á1wy.
á1xy.
áx1y
á1zy.
áz1y
á1rry.
árr1y
á1lly.
áll1y
á1chy.
é1by.
éb1y
é1cy.
éc1y
é1dy.
éd1y
é1fy.
éf1y
é1gy.
ég1y
é1hy.
é1jy.
éj1y
é1ky.
ék1y
é1ly.
él1y
é1my.
ém1y
é1ny.
én1y
é1ñy.
éñ1y
é1py.
ép1y
é1qy.
é1ry.
ér1y
é1sy.
és1y
é1ty.
ét1y
é1vy.
é1wy.
é1xy.
éx1y
é1zy.
éz1y
é1rry.
érr1y
é1lly.
éll1y
é1chy.
í1by.
íb1y
í1cy.
íc1y
í1dy.
íd1y
í1fy.
íf1y
í1gy.
íg1y
í1hy.
í1jy.
íj1y
í1ky.
ík1y
í1ly.
íl1y
í1my.
ím1y
í1ny.
ín1y
í1ñy.
íñ1y
í1py.
íp1y
í1qy.
í1ry.
ír1y
í1sy.
ís1y
í1ty.
ít1y
í1vy.
í1wy.
í1xy.
íx1y
í1zy.
íz1y
í1rry.
írr1y
í1lly.
íll1y
í1chy.
ó1by.
ób1y
ó1cy.
óc1y
ó1dy.
ód1y
ó1fy.
óf1y
ó1gy.
óg1y
ó1hy.
ó1jy.
ój1y
ó1ky.
ók1y
ó1ly.
ól1y
ó1my.
óm1y
ó1ny.
ón1y
ó1ñy.
óñ1y
ó1py.
óp1y
ó1qy.
ó1ry.
ór1y
ó1sy.
ós1y
ó1ty.
ót1y
ó1vy.
ó1wy.
ó1xy.
óx1y
ó1zy.
óz1y
ó1rry.
órr1y
ó1lly.
óll1y
ó1chy.
ú1by.
úb1y
ú1cy.
úc1y
ú1dy.
úd1y
ú1fy.
úf1y
ú1gy.
úg1y
ú1hy.
ú1jy.
új1y
ú1ky.
úk1y
ú1ly.
úl1y
ú1my.
úm1y
ú1ny.
ún1y
ú1ñy.
úñ1y
ú1py.
úp1y
ú1qy.
ú1ry.
úr1y
ú1sy.
ús1y
ú1ty.
út1y
ú1vy.
ú1wy.
ú1xy.
úx1y
ú1zy.
úz1y
ú1rry.
úrr1y
ú1lly.
úll1y
ú1chy.
a1bl
a1cl
a1fl
a1gl
a1kl
a1pl
a1t1l
e1bl
e1cl
e1fl
e1gl
e1kl
e1pl
e1t1l
i1bl
i1cl
i1fl
i1gl
i1kl
i1pl
i1t1l
o1bl
o1cl
o1fl
o1gl
o1kl
o1pl
o1t1l
u1bl
u1cl
u1fl
u1gl
u1kl
u1pl
u1t1l
ü1bl
ü1cl
ü1fl
ü1gl
ü1kl
ü1pl
ü1t1l
á1bl
á1cl
á1fl
á1gl
á1kl
á1pl
á1t1l
é1bl
é1cl
é1fl
é1gl
é1kl
é1pl
é1t1l
í1bl
í1cl
í1fl
í1gl
í1kl
í1pl
í1t1l
ó1bl
ó1cl
ó1fl
ó1gl
ó1kl
ó1pl
ó1t1l
ú1bl
ú1cl
ú1fl
ú1gl
ú1kl
ú1pl
ú1t1l
a1br
a1cr
a1dr
a1fr
a1gr
a1kr
a1pr
a1tr
e1br
e1cr
e1dr
e1fr
e1gr
e1kr
e1pr
e1tr
i1br
i1cr
i1dr
i1fr
i1gr
i1kr
i1pr
i1tr
o1br
o1cr
o1dr
o1fr
o1gr
o1kr
o1pr
o1tr
u1br
u1cr
u1dr
u1fr
u1gr
u1kr
u1pr
u1tr
ü1br
ü1cr
ü1dr
ü1fr
ü1gr
ü1kr
ü1pr
ü1tr
á1br
á1cr
á1dr
á1fr
á1gr
á1kr
á1pr
á1tr
é1br
é1cr
é1dr
é1fr
é1gr
é1kr
é1pr
é1tr
í1br
í1cr
í1dr
í1fr
í1gr
í1kr
í1pr
í1tr
ó1br
ó1cr
ó1dr
ó1fr
ó1gr
ó1kr
ó1pr
ó1tr
ú1br
ú1cr
ú1dr
ú1fr
ú1gr
ú1kr
ú1pr
ú1tr
b1sa
b1se
b1si
b1so
b1su
b1sü
b1sá
b1sé
b1sí
b1só
b1sú
c1s
c1sa
c1se
c1si
c1so
c1su
c1sü
c1sá
c1sé
c1sí
c1só
c1sú
d1sa
d1se
d1si
d1so
d1su
d1sü
d1sá
d1sé
d1sí
d1só
d1sú
k1sa
k1se
k1si
k1so
k1su
k1sü
k1sá
k1sé
k1sí
k1só
k1sú
n1sa
n1se
n1si
n1so
n1su
n1sü
n1sá
n1sé
n1sí
n1só
n1sú
l1sa
l1se
l1si
l1so
l1su
l1sü
l1sá
l1sé
l1sí
l1só
l1sú
r1sa
r1se
r1si
r1so
r1su
r1sü
r1sá
r1sé
r1sí
r1só
r1sú
x1s
x1sa
x1se
x1si
x1so
x1su
x1sü
x1sá
x1sé
x1sí
x1só
x1sú
s1b
z1b
j1b
x1b
c1b
m1b
ñ1b
l1l
ll1b
ch1b
s1c
z1c
j1c
x1c
c1c
m1c
ñ1c
ll1c
ch1c
s1d
z1d
j1d
x1d
c1d
m1d
ñ1d
ll1d
ch1d
s1f
z1f
j1f
x1f
c1f
m1f
ñ1f
ll1f
ch1f
s1g
z1g
j1g
x1g
c1g
m1g
ñ1g
ll1g
ch1g
s1h
z1h
j1h
x1h
m1h
ñ1h
ll1h
ch1h
s1j
z1j
j1j
x1j
c1j
m1j
ñ1j
ll1j
ch1j
s1k
z1k
j1k
x1k
c1k
m1k
ñ1k
ll1k
ch1k
s1l
z1l
j1l
x1l
m1l
ñ1l
l1l1l
ch1l
s1m
z1m
j1m
x1m
c1m
m1m
ñ1m
ll1m
ch1m
s1n
z1n
j1n
x1n
c1n
m1n
ñ1n
ll1n
ch1n
s1ñ
z1ñ
j1ñ
x1ñ
c1ñ
m1ñ
ñ1ñ
ll1ñ
ch1ñ
s1p
z1p
j1p
x1p
c1p
m1p
ñ1p
ll1p
ch1p
s1q
z1q
j1q
x1q
c1q
m1q
ñ1q
ll1q
ch1q
s1r
z1r
j1r
x1r
m1r
ñ1r
ll1r
ch1r
s1s
z1s
j1s
m1s
ñ1s
ll1s
ch1s
s1t
z1t
j1t
x1t
c1t
m1t
ñ1t
ll1t
ch1t
s1v
z1v
j1v
x1v
c1v
m1v
ñ1v
ll1v
ch1v
s1w
z1w
j1w
x1w
c1w
m1w
ñ1w
ll1w
ch1w
s1x
z1x
j1x
x1x
c1x
m1x
ñ1x
ll1x
ch1x
s1y
z1y
j1y
x1y
c1y
m1y
ñ1y
s1z
z1z
j1z
x1z
c1z
m1z
ñ1z
ll1z
ch1z
b1b
k1b
b1c
k1c
b1d
k1d
b1f
k1f
b1g
k1g
b1h
k1h
b1j
k1j
b1k
k1k
b1m
k1m
b1n
k1n
b1ñ
k1ñ
b1p
k1p
b1q
k1q
b1t
k1t
b1v
k1v
b1w
k1w
b1x
k1x
b1y
k1y
b1z
k1z
p1b
g1b
f1b
p1c
g1c
f1c
p1d
g1d
f1d
p1f
g1f
f1f
p1g
g1g
f1g
p1h
g1h
f1h
p1j
g1j
f1j
p1k
g1k
f1k
p1m
g1m
f1m
p1n
g1n
f1n
p1ñ
g1ñ
f1ñ
p1p
g1p
f1p
p1q
g1q
f1q
p1s
g1s
f1s
p1t
g1t
f1t
p1v
g1v
f1v
p1w
g1w
f1w
p1x
g1x
f1x
p1y
g1y
f1y
p1z
g1z
f1z
d1b
d1c
d1d
d1f
d1g
d1h
d1j
d1k
d1l
d1m
d1n
d1ñ
d1p
d1q
d1t
d1v
d1w
d1x
d1y
d1z
t1b
t1c
t1d
t1f
t1g
t1h
t1j
t1k
t1l
t1m
t1n
t1ñ
t1p
t1q
t1s
t1t
t1v
t1w
t1x
t1y
t1z
n1b
l1b
r1b
n1c
l1c
r1c
n1d
l1d
r1d
n1f
l1f
r1f
n1g
l1g
r1g
n1h
l1h
r1h
n1j
l1j
r1j
n1k
l1k
r1k
n1l
r1l
n1m
l1m
r1m
n1n
l1n
r1n
n1ñ
l1ñ
r1ñ
n1p
l1p
r1p
n1q
l1q
r1q
n1r
l1r
n1t
l1t
r1t
n1v
l1v
r1v
n1w
l1w
r1w
n1x
l1x
r1x
n1y
l1y
r1y
n1z
l1z
r1z
a1a
a1e
a1o
e1a
e1e
e1o
o1a
o1e
o1o
á1a
á1e
á1o
é1a
é1e
é1o
í1a
í1e
í1o
ó1a
ó1e
ó1o
ú1a
ú1e
ú1o
a1á
e1á
o1á
a1é
e1é
o1é
a1í
e1í
o1í
a1ó
e1ó
o1ó
a1ú
e1ú
o1ú
i1i
i1í
í1i
u1u
u1ú
ú1u
